Utah statutes.
63M-7-402.   Terms of members -- Vacancies -- Reappointment.

(1) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (1)(b), as terms of current commission members expire, the appointing authority shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the appointing authority shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of commission members are staggered so that approximately half of the commission is appointed every two years.

(2)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(3)  All members of the commission, including those appointed before July 1, 1995, shall be eligible for reappointment one time.

